Illinois, session 104th, HB3406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 36-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/36-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 36-1)7    Sec. 36-1. Property subject to forfeiture. 8    (a) Any vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is 9subject to forfeiture under this Article if the vessel or 10watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is used with the knowledge 11and consent of the owner in the commission of or in the attempt 12to commit as defined in Section 8-4 of this Code: 13        (1) an offense prohibited by Section 9-1 (first degree 14    murder), Section 9-3 (involuntary manslaughter and 15    reckless homicide), Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnaping), 16    Section 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.30 17    (aggravated criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.40 18    (predatory criminal sexual assault of a child), subsection 19    (a) of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse), subsection 20    (a), (c), or (d) of Section 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 21    sexual abuse), Section 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a 22    child), Section 11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution 23    except for keeping a place of juvenile prostitution),   HB3406- 2 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1    Section 11-20.1 (child pornography), paragraph (a)(1), 2    (a)(2), (a)(4), (b)(1), (b)(2), (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), 3    (e)(4), (e)(5), (e)(6), or (e)(7) of Section 12-3.05 4    (aggravated battery), Section 12-7.3 (stalking), Section 5    12-7.4 (aggravated stalking), Section 16-1 (theft if the 6    theft is of precious metal or of scrap metal), subdivision 7    (f)(2) or (f)(3) of Section 16-25 (retail theft), Section 8    18-2 (armed robbery), Section 19-1 (burglary), Section 9    19-2 (possession of burglary tools), Section 19-3 10    (residential burglary), Section 20-1 (arson; residential 11    arson; place of worship arson), Section 20-2 (possession 12    of explosives or explosive or incendiary devices), 13    subdivision (a)(6) or (a)(7) of Section 24-1 (unlawful 14    possession of weapons), Section 24-1.2 (aggravated 15    discharge of a firearm), Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated 16    discharge of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a 17    device designed or used for silencing the report of a 18    firearm), Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 19    firearm), Section 28-1 (gambling), or Section 29D-15.2 20    (possession of a deadly substance) of this Code;21        (2) an offense prohibited by Section 21, 22, 23, 24 or 22    26 of the Cigarette Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft, 23    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 24    cigarettes;25        (3) an offense prohibited by Section 28, 29, or 30 of 26    the Cigarette Use Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft,   HB3406- 3 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 2    cigarettes;3        (4) an offense prohibited by Section 44 of the 4    Environmental Protection Act;5        (4.1) an offense prohibited by Section 11-204 of the 6    Illinois Vehicle Code (fleeing or attempting to elude a 7    peace officer); 8        (5) an offense prohibited by Section 11-204.1 of the 9    Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated fleeing or attempting to 10    elude a peace officer);11        (6) an offense prohibited by Section 11-501 of the 12    Illinois Vehicle Code (driving while under the influence 13    of alcohol or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound 14    or compounds or any combination thereof) or a similar 15    provision of a local ordinance, and:16            (A) during a period in which his or her driving 17        privileges are revoked or suspended if the revocation 18        or suspension was for:19                (i) Section 11-501 (driving under the 20            influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 21            intoxicating compound or compounds or any 22            combination thereof), 23                (ii) Section 11-501.1 (statutory summary 24            suspension or revocation),25                (iii) paragraph (b) of Section 11-401 (motor 26            vehicle crashes involving death or personal   HB3406- 4 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1            injuries), or2                (iv) reckless homicide as defined in Section 3            9-3 of this Code;4            (B) has been previously convicted of reckless 5        homicide or a similar provision of a law of another 6        state relating to reckless homicide in which the 7        person was determined to have been under the influence 8        of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 9        compound or compounds as an element of the offense or 10        the person has previously been convicted of committing 11        a violation of driving under the influence of alcohol 12        or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 13        compounds or any combination thereof and was involved 14        in a motor vehicle crash that resulted in death, great 15        bodily harm, or permanent disability or disfigurement 16        to another, when the violation was a proximate cause 17        of the death or injuries;18            (C) the person committed a violation of driving 19        under the influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 20        intoxicating compound or compounds or any combination 21        thereof under Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle 22        Code or a similar provision for the third or 23        subsequent time;24            (D) he or she did not possess a valid driver's 25        license or permit or a valid restricted driving permit 26        or a valid judicial driving permit or a valid   HB3406- 5 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1        monitoring device driving permit; or2            (E) he or she knew or should have known that the 3        vehicle he or she was driving was not covered by a 4        liability insurance policy;5        (7) an offense described in subsection (g) of Section 6    6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;7        (8) an offense described in subsection (e) of Section 8    6-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; or9        (9)(A) operating a watercraft under the influence of 10    alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 11    compounds, or combination thereof under Section 5-16 of 12    the Boat Registration and Safety Act during a period in 13    which his or her privileges to operate a watercraft are 14    revoked or suspended and the revocation or suspension was 15    for operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 16    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 17    or combination thereof; (B) operating a watercraft under 18    the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 19    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 20    and has been previously convicted of reckless homicide or 21    a similar provision of a law in another state relating to 22    reckless homicide in which the person was determined to 23    have been under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 24    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination 25    thereof as an element of the offense or the person has 26    previously been convicted of committing a violation of   HB3406- 6 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1    operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 2    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 3    or combination thereof and was involved in an accident 4    that resulted in death, great bodily harm, or permanent 5    disability or disfigurement to another, when the violation 6    was a proximate cause of the death or injuries; or (C) the 7    person committed a violation of operating a watercraft 8    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 9    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 10    under Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and Safety Act 11    or a similar provision for the third or subsequent time.12    (b) In addition, any mobile or portable equipment used in 13the commission of an act which is in violation of Section 7g of 14the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act shall be 15subject to seizure and forfeiture under the same procedures 16provided in this Article for the seizure and forfeiture of 17vessels or watercraft, vehicles, and aircraft, and any such 18equipment shall be deemed a vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or 19aircraft for purposes of this Article.20    (c) In addition, when a person discharges a firearm at 21another individual from a vehicle with the knowledge and 22consent of the owner of the vehicle and with the intent to 23cause death or great bodily harm to that individual and as a 24result causes death or great bodily harm to that individual, 25the vehicle shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture under 26the same procedures provided in this Article for the seizure   HB3406- 7 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1and forfeiture of vehicles used in violations of clauses (1), 2(2), (3), or (4) of subsection (a) of this Section.3    (d) If the spouse of the owner of a vehicle seized for an 4offense described in subsection (g) of Section 6-303 of the 5Illinois Vehicle Code, a violation of subdivision (d)(1)(A), 6(d)(1)(D), (d)(1)(G), (d)(1)(H), or (d)(1)(I) of Section 711-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or Section 9-3 of this 8Code makes a showing that the seized vehicle is the only source 9of transportation and it is determined that the financial 10hardship to the family as a result of the seizure outweighs the 11benefit to the State from the seizure, the vehicle may be 12forfeited to the spouse or family member and the title to the 13vehicle shall be transferred to the spouse or family member 14who is properly licensed and who requires the use of the 15vehicle for employment or family transportation purposes. A 16written declaration of forfeiture of a vehicle under this 17Section shall be sufficient cause for the title to be 18transferred to the spouse or family member. The provisions of 19this paragraph shall apply only to one forfeiture per vehicle. 20If the vehicle is the subject of a subsequent forfeiture 21proceeding by virtue of a subsequent conviction of either 22spouse or the family member, the spouse or family member to 23whom the vehicle was forfeited under the first forfeiture 24proceeding may not utilize the provisions of this paragraph in 25another forfeiture proceeding. If the owner of the vehicle 26seized owns more than one vehicle, the procedure set out in   HB3406- 8 -LRB104 11410 RLC 21498 b1this paragraph may be used for only one vehicle.2    (e) In addition, property subject to forfeiture under 3Section 40 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 4Prevention Act may be seized and forfeited under this Article.5(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.)